lexd_components/hyx-nouns_lex_suffixbased.lexd
#List of all words that take the ութիւն suffix
#The suffix utjun cannot be part of the stem
LEXICON NounUtjunSuffix
ցրտրմպութիւն:ցրտրմպ
յանգաչափութիւն:յանգաչափ
երդմնեցուցչութիւն:երդմնեցուցչ
մրգաբերութիւն:մրգաբեր
որբութիւն:որբ
քաջաբանութիւն:քաջաբան
կեղտոտութիւն:կեղտոտ
կրկնատեսութիւն:կրկնատես
լեզուագիտութիւն:լեզուագիտ
դաւակցութիւն:դաւակց
գանձապահութիւն:գանձապահ
որոճողութիւն:որոճող
խռովասիրութիւն:խռովասիր
գործասիրութիւն:գործասիր
ամբեւտասպանութիւն:ամբեւտասպան
ամօթխածութիւն:ամօթխած
այժմէականութիւն:այժմէական
այլավարակութիւն:այլավարակ
անզուգականութիւն:անզուգական
անխոհականութիւն:անխոհական
գրահմայութիւն:գրահմայ
երկնաբանութիւն:երկնաբան
ծերաբանութիւն:ծերաբան
ծննդաբաշխութիւն:ծննդաբաշխ
սխալակութիւն:սխալակ
վերագունութիւն:վերագուն
վերլուծաբանութիւն:վերլուծաբան
երկգունաւորութիւն:երկգունաւոր
սնափառութիւն:սնափառ
առաջնորդութիւն:առաջնորդ
արիութիւն:արի
արիւնահեղութիւն:արիւնահեղ
բծաւորութիւն:բծաւոր
զանցառութիւն:զանցառ
ընդդիմութիւն:ընդդիմ
խառնակութիւն:խառնակ
կակղութիւն:կակղ
կայունութիւն:կայուն
կարկամութիւն:կարկամ
համագործութիւն:համագործ
հարստութիւն:հարստ
հրարկութիւն:հրարկ
տնաշինութիւն:տնաշին
գիշերայածութիւն:գիշերայած
երկխմբութիւն:երկխմբ
միախմբութիւն:միախմբ
տարապայմանողութիւն:տարապայմանող
փոխյարաբերութիւն:փոխյարաբեր
փոխնախագահութիւն:փոխնախագահ
պաճարաբուծութիւն:պաճարաբուծ
մելամաղձութիւն:մելամաղձ
մեծամոլութիւն:մեծամոլ
մեծասրտութիւն:մեծասրտ
յաճախութիւն:յաճախ
յառաջդիմութիւն:յառաջդիմ
նշանաբանութիւն:նշանաբան
պարկեշտաբանութիւն:պարկեշտաբան
ջրախուսութիւն:ջրախուս
ռատիոգիտութիւն:ռատիոգիտ
վատախառնութիւն:վատախառն
տարագրութիւն:տարագր
տարաձայնութիւն:տարաձայն
տեսութիւն:տես
տժգունութիւն:տժգուն
ցուցականութիւն:ցուցական
փոխադրութիւն:փոխադր
քաղաքապետութիւն:քաղաքապետ
օրագրութիւն:օրագր
աբբայութիւն:աբբայ
աբեղայութիւն:աբեղայ
ագահութիւն:ագահ
ագարակաբանութիւն:ագարակաբան
ագարակագիտութիւն:ագարակագիտ
ազատագրութիւն:ազատագր
ազատածնութիւն:ազատածն
ազատականութիւն:ազատական
ազատատոհմութիւն:ազատատոհմ
ազատութիւն:ազատ
ազգաբանութիւն:ազգաբան
ազգագրութիւն:ազգագր
ազգախառնութիւն:ազգախառն
ազգախօսութիւն:ազգախօս
ազգականութիւն:ազգական
ազգակցութիւն:ազգակց
ազգահամարութիւն:ազգահամար
ազգահանութիւն:ազգահան
ազգահատութիւն:ազգահատ
ազգայնականութիւն:ազգայնական
ազգայնամոլութիւն:ազգայնամոլ
ազգայնութիւն:ազգայն
ազգապետութիւն:ազգապետ
ազգապղծութիւն:ազգապղծ
ազգասիրութիւն:ազգասիր
ազգատոհմակցութիւն:ազգատոհմակց
ազգաւորութիւն:ազգաւոր
ազգութիւն:ազգ
ազդարարութիւն:ազդարար
ազդեցութիւն:ազդեց
ազդողութիւն:ազդող
ազնուազգութիւն:ազնուազգ
ազնուականութիւն:ազնուական
ազնուապետութիւն:ազնուապետ
ազնուատոհմութիւն:ազնուատոհմ
ազնուութիւն:ազնու
աթաբէկութիւն:աթաբէկ
աթոռակալութիւն:աթոռակալ
աժանութիւն:աժան
ալեկոծութիւն:ալեկոծ
ալեւորութիւն:ալեւոր
ալիւրադիւթութիւն:ալիւրադիւթ
ալքոլականութիւն:ալքոլական
ախոնդանոտութիւն:ախոնդանոտ
ախոնդացաւութիւն:ախոնդացաւ
ախոռապահութիւն:ախոռապահ
ախտաբանութիւն:ախտաբան
ախտաբուժութիւն:ախտաբուժ
ախտագուշակութիւն:ախտագուշակ
ախտազերծութիւն:ախտազերծ
ախտաժէտութիւն:ախտաժէտ
ախտածնութիւն:ախտածն
ախտակրութիւն:ախտակր
ախտաճանաչութիւն:ախտաճանաչ
ախտամոլութիւն:ախտամոլ
ախտասիրութիւն:ախտասիր
ախտաւորութիւն:ախտաւոր
ածխահանութիւն:ածխահան
ածխահարութիւն:ածխահար
ածխավաճառութիւն:ածխավաճառ
ականատեսութիւն:ականատես
ականջաբանութիւն:ականջաբան
ականջագրութիւն:ականջագր
ականջադրութիւն:ականջադր
ակնագործութիւն:ակնագործ
ակնածութիւն:ակնած
ակնառութիւն:ակնառ
ակնավաճառութիւն:ակնավաճառ
ակնարկութիւն:ակնարկ
ակներեւութիւն:ակներեւ
ակնկալութիւն:ակնկալ
ակնկորութիւն:ակնկոր
ակնհատութիւն:ակնհատ
ահաբեկութիւն:ահաբեկ
ահագնութիւն:ահագն
ահարկութիւն:ահարկ
ահաւորութիւն:ահաւոր
ահռելիութիւն:ահռելի
աղաբանութիւն:աղաբան
աղագործութիւն:աղագործ
աղագրութիւն:աղագր
աղահմայութիւն:աղահմայ
աղամարութիւն:աղամար
աղանդաւորութիւն:աղանդաւոր
աղավաճառութիւն:աղավաճառ
աղարտութիւն:աղարտ
աղաւաղութիւն:աղաւաղ
աղբակերութիւն:աղբակեր
աղեբանութիւն:աղեբան
աղեգրութիւն:աղեգր
աղեդարձութիւն:աղեդարձ
աղեթափութիւն:աղեթափ
աղեխցութիւն:աղեխց
աղեհատութիւն:աղեհատ
աղերսաբանութիւն:աղերսաբան
աղերսագրութիւն:աղերսագր
աղեցաւութիւն:աղեցաւ
աղէթափութիւն:աղէթափ
աղէխցութիւն:աղէխց
աղէկութիւն:աղէկ
աղիկամութիւն:աղիկամ
աղիւսագործութիւն:աղիւսագործ
աղծապղծութիւն:աղծապղծ
աղճատաբանութիւն:աղճատաբան
աղութիւն:աղ
աղուորութիւն:աղուոր
աղտեղութիւն:աղտեղ
աղցաւորութիւն:աղցաւոր
աղքատասիրութիւն:աղքատասիր
աղքատութիւն:աղքատ
աղօթասիրութիւն:աղօթասիր
աղօտութիւն:աղօտ
աղօրեպանութիւն:աղօրեպան
աճառաբանութիւն:աճառաբան
աճառահատութիւն:աճառահատ
աճպարարութիւն:աճպարար
ամայութիւն:ամայ
ամբաստանութիւն:ամբաստան
ամբարհաւաճութիւն:ամբարհաւաճ
ամբարշտութիւն:ամբարշտ
ամբարտաւանութիւն:ամբարտաւան
ամբոխավարութիւն:ամբոխավար
ամբոխութիւն:ամբոխ
ամբողջութիւն:ամբողջ
ամեհութիւն:ամեհ
ամենագիտութիւն:ամենագիտ
ամենագրութիւն:ամենագր
ամենազօրութիւն:ամենազօր
ամենակալութիւն:ամենակալ
ամենակարողութիւն:ամենակարող
ամենաստուածութիւն:ամենաստուած
ամենուրեքութիւն:ամենուրեք
ամիրապետութիւն:ամիրապետ
ամլութիւն:ամլ
ամուսնաբանութիւն:ամուսնաբան
ամուսնաթողութիւն:ամուսնաթող
ամուսնութիւն:ամուսն
ամուրիութիւն:ամուրի
ամպաբանութիւն:ամպաբան
ամպահարութիւն:ամպահար
ամպարշտութիւն:ամպարշտ
ամսաբանութիւն:ամսաբան
ամրագործութիւն:ամրագործ
ամրութիւն:ամր
ամփոփութիւն:ամփոփ
այգեգործութիւն:այգեգործ
այգեմշակութիւն:այգեմշակ
այժմէութիւն:այժմէ
այլաբանութիւն:այլաբան
այլաբուժութիւն:այլաբուժ
այլագունութիւն:այլագուն
այլագրութիւն:այլագր
այլադասութիւն:այլադաս
այլադարձութիւն:այլադարձ
այլադաւանութիւն:այլադաւան
այլադրութիւն:այլադր
այլազանութիւն:այլազան
այլազգութիւն:այլազգ
այլազրկութիւն:այլազրկ
այլակազմութիւն:այլակազմ
այլակարգութիւն:այլակարգ
այլակերպութիւն:այլակերպ
այլակութիւն:այլակ
այլահաւատութիւն:այլահաւատ
այլաձայնութիւն:այլաձայն
այլայլութիւն:այլայլ
այլանդակութիւն:այլանդակ
այլաշարժութիւն:այլաշարժ
այլաչափութիւն:այլաչափ
այլառիչութիւն:այլառիչ
այլասացութիւն:այլասաց
այլասեռութիւն:այլասեռ
այլասիրութիւն:այլասիր
այլատեղութիւն:այլատեղ
այլատեսութիւն:այլատես
այլափառութիւն:այլափառ
այլափոխութիւն:այլափոխ
այլուրկայութիւն:այլուրկայ
այլուրութիւն:այլուր
այխախորշութիւն:այխախորշ
այսաբանութիւն:այսաբան
այսահանութիւն:այսահան
այտակազմութիւն:այտակազմ
այտուցաբանութիւն:այտուցաբան
այրասիրութիւն:այրասիր
այրասպանութիւն:այրասպան
այրեցականութիւն:այրեցական
այրեցողութիւն:այրեցող
այրիութիւն:այրի
այրութիւն:այր
այցարարութիւն:այցարար
այցելութիւն:այցել
անագանութիւն:անագան
անագանուսումնութիւն:անագանուսումն
անագորունութիւն:անագորուն
անազատութիւն:անազատ
անազնուականութիւն:անազնուական
անազնուութիւն:անազնու
անախորժութիւն:անախորժ
անախտութիւն:անախտ
անակնածութիւն:անակնած
անաճելիութիւն:անաճելի
անամուսնութիւն:անամուսն
անամօթութիւն:անամօթ
անայլայլականութիւն:անայլայլական
անանձնաւորութիւն:անանձնաւոր
անաչառութիւն:անաչառ
անապականութիւն:անապական
անապաշաւութիւն:անապաշաւ
անապաշխարութիւն:անապաշխար
անառակութիւն:անառակ
անառաւելութիւն:անառաւել
անառիկութիւն:անառիկ
անառողջութիւն:անառողջ
անասնաբուժութիւն:անասնաբուժ
անասնաբուծութիւն:անասնաբուծ
անասնագիտութիւն:անասնագիտ
անասնագողութիւն:անասնագող
անասնագրութիւն:անասնագր
անասնազննութիւն:անասնազնն
անասնազոհութիւն:անասնազոհ
անասնախտութիւն:անասնախտ
անասնահատութիւն:անասնահատ
անասնամոլութիւն:անասնամոլ
անասնապաշտութիւն:անասնապաշտ
անասնութիւն:անասն
անաստուածութիւն:անաստուած
անատակութիւն:անատակ
անարատութիւն:անարատ
անարբունութիւն:անարբուն
անարգասաւորութիւն:անարգասաւոր
անարգելութիւն:անարգել
անարգութիւն:անարգ
անարդարութիւն:անարդար
անարդիւնաբերութիւն:անարդիւնաբեր
անարդութիւն:անարդ
անարժանութիւն:անարժան
անարիութիւն:անարի
անարիւնութիւն:անարիւն
անարծաթասիրութիւն:անարծաթասիր
անարուեստութիւն:անարուեստ
անաւագութիւն:անաւագ
անբաժանականութիւն:անբաժանական
անբաժանութիւն:անբաժան
անբախտութիւն:անբախտ
անբաղդութիւն:անբաղդ
անբանութիւն:անբան
անբարեխառնութիւն:անբարեխառն
անբարեպաշտութիւն:անբարեպաշտ
անբարոյականութիւն:անբարոյական
անբարութիւն:անբար
անբաւականութիւն:անբաւական
անբաւութիւն:անբաւ
անբերութիւն:անբեր
անբերրութիւն:անբերր
անբժշկելիութիւն:անբժշկելի
անբժշկութիւն:անբժշկ
անբծութիւն:անբծ
անբնակութիւն:անբնակ
անբուժելիութիւն:անբուժելի
անբռնաբարութիւն:անբռնաբար
անգաղտնապահութիւն:անգաղտնապահ
անգայտութիւն:անգայտ
անգեղեցկութիւն:անգեղեցկ
անգթութիւն:անգթ
անգիտակցութիւն:անգիտակց
անգիտութիւն:անգիտ
անգլիականութիւն:անգլիական
անգլիատեացութիւն:անգլիատեաց
անգլխութիւն:անգլխ
անգղիաբանութիւն:անգղիաբան
անգղիամոլութիւն:անգղիամոլ
անգոյութիւն:անգոյ
անգոսնութիւն:անգոսն
անգործադրութիւն:անգործադր
անգործածութիւն:անգործած
անգործութիւն:անգործ
անգործունէութիւն:անգործունէ
անգորովութիւն:անգորով
անգրութիւն:անգր
անդամազննութիւն:անդամազնն
անդամալուծութիւն:անդամալուծ
անդամախեղութիւն:անդամախեղ
անդամակցութիւն:անդամակց
անդամահատութիւն:անդամահատ
անդամատութիւն:անդամատ
անդանդաղութիւն:անդանդաղ
անդաչափութիւն:անդաչափ
անդասութիւն:անդաս
անդարձութիւն:անդարձ
անդէորդութիւն:անդէորդ
անդորրութիւն:անդորր
անդուլութիւն:անդուլ
անդրադարձութիւն:անդրադարձ
անդրալեռնականութիւն:անդրալեռնական
անդրանկութիւն:անդրանկ
անդրապատմութիւն:անդրապատմ
անդրաստորոգութիւն:անդրաստորոգ
անդրատառութիւն:անդրատառ
անդրդուութիւն:անդրդու
անդրժականութիւն:անդրժական
անդրժելիութիւն:անդրժելի
անդրիագործութիւն:անդրիագործ
անդրիանդագործութիւն:անդրիանդագործ
անդրլեռնականութիւն:անդրլեռնական
անեղծութիւն:անեղծ
անեռանդութիւն:անեռանդ
անեռացականութիւն:անեռացական
աներանգութիւն:աներանգ
աներեսութիւն:աներես
աներեւութիւն:աներեւ
աներեւութութիւն:աներեւութ
աներկբայութիւն:աներկբայ
աներկեւանութիւն:աներկեւան
աներկիւղութիւն:աներկիւղ
անզանազանութիւն:անզանազան
անզարդարութիւն:անզարդար
անզարկութիւն:անզարկ
անզաւակութիւն:անզաւակ
անզբաղութիւն:անզբաղ
անզգամութիւն:անզգամ
անզգայութիւն:անզգայ
անզգաստութիւն:անզգաստ
անզգուշութիւն:անզգուշ
անզղջութիւն:անզղջ
անզուգութիւն:անզուգ
անզօրաբանութիւն:անզօրաբան
անզօրութիւն:անզօր
անէութիւն:անէ
անըմբռնողութիւն:անըմբռնող
անընդունակութիւն:անընդունակ
անընդունելիութիւն:անընդունելի
անընդունելութիւն:անընդունել
անընկերականութիւն:անընկերական
անընչեղութիւն:անընչեղ
անընչութիւն:անընչ
անընտելութիւն:անընտել
անընտրողութիւն:անընտրող
անթափանցականութիւն:անթափանցական
անթափանցելիութիւն:անթափանցելի
անթիպատութիւն:անթիպատ
անթլփատութիւն:անթլփատ
անժամանութիւն:անժաման
անժառանգութիւն:անժառանգ
անժողովրդականութիւն:անժողովրդական
անժուժկալութիւն:անժուժկալ
անժուժութիւն:անժուժ
անիծաբանութիւն:անիծաբան
անիմայութիւն:անիմայ
անինքնաբացութիւն:անինքնաբաց
անիշխանութիւն:անիշխան
անիրագործութիւն:անիրագործ
անիրաւութիւն:անիրաւ
անլուծականութիւն:անլուծական
անլուծելիութիւն:անլուծելի
անլսելիութիւն:անլսելի
անլսողութիւն:անլսող
անխախտականութիւն:անխախտական
անխայութիւն:անխայ
անխելութիւն:անխել
անխելքութիւն:անխելք
անխղճութիւն:անխղճ
անխոհեմութիւն:անխոհեմ
անխոնջութիւն:անխոնջ
անխորհրդածութիւն:անխորհրդած
անխորհրդապահութիւն:անխորհրդապահ
անխռովութիւն:անխռով
անխտրականութիւն:անխտրական
անխտրութիւն:անխտր
անխրատութիւն:անխրատ
անխօսութիւն:անխօս
անծանօթութիւն:անծանօթ
անծարաւութիւն:անծարաւ
անծիածանութիւն:անծիածան
անծննդականութիւն:անծննդական
անծննդութիւն:անծննդ
անկազմակերպութիւն:անկազմակերպ
անկազմութիւն:անկազմ
անկաթնութիւն:անկաթն
անկախութիւն:անկախ
անկածութիւն:անկած
անկամութիւն:անկամ
անկայութիւն:անկայ
անկանոնութիւն:անկանոն
անկաշառութիւն:անկաշառ
անկապակցութիւն:անկապակց
անկապաշտութիւն:անկապաշտ
անկասկածութիւն:անկասկած
անկատարելիութիւն:անկատարելի
անկատարելութիւն:անկատարել
անկատարութիւն:անկատար
անկարգութիւն:անկարգ
անկարելիութիւն:անկարելի
անկարողութիւն:անկարող
անկարութիւն:անկար
անկարօտութիւն:անկարօտ
անկեղծաւորութիւն:անկեղծաւոր
անկեղծութիւն:անկեղծ
անկենդանութիւն:անկենդան
անկերակրութիւն:անկերակր
անկիզութիւն:անկիզ
անկիւնաչափութիւն:անկիւնաչափ
անկլիկանութիւն:անկլիկան
անկշռականութիւն:անկշռական
անկողմնակալութիւն:անկողմնակալ
անկողնակցութիւն:անկողնակց
անկորստականութիւն:անկորստական
անկրթութիւն:անկրթ
անկրօնութիւն:անկրօն
անկցորդութիւն:անկցորդ
անհալութիւն:անհալ
անհաճոյութիւն:անհաճոյ
անհամակեդրոնութիւն:անհամակեդրոն
անհամակերպութիւն:անհամակերպ
անհամաձայնութիւն:անհամաձայն
անհամաձեւութիւն:անհամաձեւ
անհամաչափութիւն:անհամաչափ
անհամբերութիւն:անհամբեր
անհամեմատութիւն:անհամեմատ
անհամեստութիւն:անհամեստ
անհամութիւն:անհամ
անհանգիտութիւն:անհանգիտ
անհանգունութիւն:անհանգուն
անհանգստութիւն:անհանգստ
անհանդարտութիւն:անհանդարտ
անհանճարութիւն:անհանճար
անհաշուելիութիւն:անհաշուելի
անհաշտութիւն:անհաշտ
անհասականութիւն:անհասական
անհասկացողութիւն:անհասկացող
անհասութիւն:անհաս
անհաստատութիւն:անհաստատ
անհատականութիւն:անհատական
անհատութիւն:անհատ
անհարազատութիւն:անհարազատ
անհարթութիւն:անհարթ
անհաւանականութիւն:անհաւանական
անհաւանութիւն:անհաւան
անհաւասարութիւն:անհաւասար
անհաւատարմութիւն:անհաւատարմ
անհաւատութիւն:անհաւատ
անհեթեթութիւն:անհեթեթ
անհետեւութիւն:անհետեւ
անհլութիւն:անհլ
անհմտութիւն:անհմտ
անհնազանդութիւն:անհնազանդ
անհնարաւորութիւն:անհնարաւոր
անհնարութիւն:անհնար
անհնութիւն:անհն
անհնչականութիւն:անհնչական
անհոգութիւն:անհոգ
